Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.334

Chief of police or marshal—Background investigation.

Before making an appointment in the office of chief of police or marshal, the appointing agency shall complete a thorough background investigation of the candidate. The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall develop advisory procedures which may be used by the appointing authority in completing its background investigation of candidates for the office of chief of police or marshal.

[ 1987 c 339 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1987 c 339: See notes following RCW 35.21.333.